Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,301
Use of pseudonym.

In any action brought pursuant to the Human Trafficking Victims Civil Remedy Act, a plaintiff may request to use a pseudonym instead of his or her legal name in all court proceedings and records. Upon finding that the use of a pseudonym is proper, the court shall ensure that the pseudonym is used in all court proceedings and records.

Laws 2015, LB294, § 5.